Utah statutes.
58-57-4.   Qualifications for a license.

(1)  The division shall issue a respiratory care practitioner license to an applicant who meets the requirements specified in this section.

(2)  An applicant seeking licensure as a respiratory care practitioner shall:

(a)  submit an application on a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department pursuant to Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  show evidence of good moral character;

(d)  possess a high school education or its equivalent, as determined by the division in collaboration with the board;

(e)  have completed a respiratory care practitioner educational program that is accredited by a nationally accredited organization acceptable to the division as defined by rule; and

(f)  pass an examination approved by the division in collaboration with the board.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

